North Dakota, session 69, SB2062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 24-02-19 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
24-02-19. Request for bids - How solicited.
Any request for bids for construction work or the improvement of any state highway, or any
structure in excess of the amount specified in section 24-02-17, must be advertised by
publication once prior to the opening of such bids, in the official newspaper of the county in
which the project is located. Any other advertisement made by the. The director may utilize one
or more ofuse the following methods to advertise:
1. The publication of the solicitation in a daily newspaper having a general circulation in
the area where the project is locatedOnline publication on the department's website or
other electronic format.
2. The publication of the solicitation in commonly recognized trade journals or similar
publications that advertise the solicitation of bids on public work projects.
3. The written solicitation of all qualified contractors appearing on the bidders' list as
maintained by the department of transportation.
When the solicitation is by publication, it must be made at least three weeks prior to the
date of the bid opening. The solicitation must state where the bidder may inspect the plans and
specifications, with whom bids must be filed, and the time and place where bids must be
opened. Such place must be the office of the department.
All requests for bids for the purchase of equipment, materials, and supplies, exclusive of
repairs to equipment and except as provided in section 25-16.2-02 in excess of the sum of
Page No. 1 25.8046.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
twenty thousand dollars must be advertised in the official newspaper of the county in which the
department district is locatedas required by this section. The advertisement must be published
once a week for a period of two successive weeks prior to the opening of such bids.
Page No. 2 25.8046.01000